dictsource/si_rules
// Sinhala Language.
// This SI_rules file is written by Him Prasad Gautam <himjee@yahoo.com> [Kathmandu, nepal]
// This file is UTF-8 encoded.

// letter groups:
// A - Alphabetical and Symbolic Vowels:
//	0x0D85~0x0D16, 0x0DCA~0x0DF3
// B - Symbolic  Vowels and Halkirima
//	0x0DCA~0x0DF3
// C - Consonants:
//	0x0D9A~0x0DC2

// speak Latin letters as English



.group ක
	ක	ka
	 ක (B	k

.group ඛ
	ඛ	k#a
	ඛ (B	k#

.group ග
	ග	ga
	ග (B	g

.group ඝ
	ඝ	g#a
	ඝ (B	g#

.group ඞ
	ඞ	Na
	ඞ (B	N

.group ඟ
	ඟ	N#ga
	ඟ (B	N#g

.group ච
	ච	tSa
	ච (B	tS

.group ඡ
	ඡ	tSha
	ඡ (B	 tSh

.group ජ
	ජ	dZa
	ජ (B	dZ

.group ඣ
	ඣ	dZha
	ඣ (B	dZh

.group ඤ
        ඤ          n^a
	ඤ (B	n^

.group ඥ
	ඥ	 gna
	ඥ (B	gn

.group ඦ
	ඦ	n^#dZa
	ඦ (B	n^#dZ

.group ට
	ට	t.a
	ට (B	t.

.group ඨ
	ඨ	t.#a
	ඨ (B	t.#

.group ඩ
        ඩ          d.a
        ඩ (B       d.

.group ඪ
	ඪ	d.a
	ඪ (B	d.

.group ණ
	ණ	n.a
	ණ (B	n.

.group ඬ
	ඬ	n.#d.a
	ඬ (B	n.#d.

.group ත
	ත	ta
	ත (B	t

.group ථ
	ථ	t#a
	ථ (B	t#

.group ද
	ද	da
	ද (B	d

.group ධ
	ධ	d#a
	ධ (B	d#

.group න
	න	na
	න (B	n

.group ඳ
	ඳ	n#da
	ඳ (B	n#d

.group ප
	ප	pa
	ප (B	p

.group ඵ
	ඵ	p#a
	ඵ (B	p#

.group බ
	බ	ba
	බ (B	b

.group භ
	භ	b#a
	භ (B	b#

.group ම
	ම	ma
	ම (B	m

.group ඹ 
	ඹ	m#ba
	ඹ (B	m#b

.group ය
	ය	ja
	ය (B	j

.group ර
	ර	ra
	ර (B	r

.group ල
	ල	la
	ල (B	l

.group ව
	ව	wa
	ව (B	w

.group ශ
	ශ	sa
	ශ (B	s

.group ෂ
        ෂ          Sa
	ෂ (B	S

.group ස
	ස	s.a
	ස (B	s.

.group හ
	හ	ha
	හ (B	h

.group ළ
	ළ	l.a
	ළ (B	l.

.group ෆ
	ෆ	fa
	ෆ (B	f

// The Vowel Alphabets

.group අ
	අ	a

.group ආ
	ආ	a:

.group ඇ
	ඇ	&

.group ඈ
	ඈ	&:

.group ඉ
	ඉ	i

.group ඊ
	ඊ	i:

.group උ
	උ	u

.group ඌ
	ඌ	u:

.group ඍ
	ඍ	ru

.group ඎ
	ඎ	ru:

.group ඏ
	ඏ	li

.group ඐ
	ඐ	li:

.group එ
	එ	e

.group ඒ
	ඒ	e:

.group ඓ
	ඓ	aI

.group ඔ
	ඔ	o

.group ඕ
	ඕ	o:

.group ඖ
	ඖ	aU



.group ං 	// anusvaray@
	ං	'anus.w,a:r@j@
	A) ං	m
	C) ං	m

.group ඃ // visargaya
	ඃ	w'is.@rg,@j@
	A) ඃ	n
	C) ඃ	n

// The Vowelic Symbols

.group ා
	ා	'&l@p,ill@
	C) ා	a:

.group ැ
	ැ	'&d@j@
	C) ැ	&

.group ෑ
	ෑ	d'i:rg@,&d@j@
	C) ෑ	&:

.group ි
	ි	'ispill@
	C) ි	i

.group ී
	ී	d'i:rg@,ispill@
	C) ී	i:

.group ු
	ු	p'a:pill@
	C) ු	u

.group ූ
	ූ	d'i:rg@p,a:pill@
	C) ූ	u:

.group ෘ
	ෘ	g'&t.@p,ill@
	C) ෘ          ru

.group ෙ
	ෙ	k'ombuv@
	C) ෙ	e


.group ෛ
	ෛ	k'ombud,ek@
	C) ෛ	aI

.group ෞ
	ෞ	g'ajan,ukitt@
	C) ෞ	aU


.group 0xe0b7   // More vowelic symbols b7]

        ේ          e:
        ො          o
        ෝ          o:
        ෟ          li
        ෲ          ru:
        ෳ          li:


.group ්
	්	halk'ir'im#@	// Halkirima
	C) ්	


.group
	$	do:l.ar




.group 0xe0a4  // devanagari
	0xe0a4	_^_NE  // Nepali voice
.group 0xe0a5  // devanagari
	0xe0a5	_^_NE

.group 0xe0ae  // Tamil
	0xe0ae  _^_TA  // Tamil voice
.group 0xe0af  // Tamil
	0xe0af  _^_TA
